dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- राम; राम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राम__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माया; माया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माया__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मिश्र; मिश्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मिश्र__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काठमाडौ; काठमाडौ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काठमाडौ__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थापा; थापा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थापा__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तामाङ; तामाङ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तामाङ__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काठमाण्डौं; काठमाण्डौं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काठमाण्डौं__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुनसरी; सुनसरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुनसरी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जापान; जापान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जापान__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शाही; शाही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शाही__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुमारी; कुमारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुमारी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विनय; विनय; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विनय__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जगन्नाथ; जगन्नाथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जगन्नाथ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फिलिपिन्स; फिलिपिन्स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फिलिपिन्स__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिलक; तिलक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिलक__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कमला; कमला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कमला__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रामकृष्ण; रामकृष्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रामकृष्ण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कर्णाली; कर्णाली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कर्णाली__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चीन; चीन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चीन__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राजविराज; राजविराज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राजविराज__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाटन; पाटन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाटन__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काँग्रेस; काँग्रेस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काँग्रेस__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुनकेशरी; सुनकेशरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुनकेशरी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्रिभुवन; त्रिभुवन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="त्रिभुवन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जर्मनी; जर्मनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जर्मनी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काङ्ग्रेस; काङ्ग्रेस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काङ्ग्रेस__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शाक्य; शाक्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शाक्य__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धर्म; धर्म; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धर्म__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धनुषा; धनुषा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धनुषा__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दक्ष; दक्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दक्ष__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निर्मल; निर्मल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निर्मल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मकवानपुर; मकवानपुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मकवानपुर__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बेलायत; बेलायत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बेलायत__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुवेत; कुवेत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुवेत__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोपाल; गोपाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोपाल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बंगलादेश; बंगलादेश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बंगलादेश__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बस्नेत; बस्नेत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बस्नेत__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="राम"><i>राम</i><par n="राम__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="माया"><i>माया</i><par n="माया__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मिश्र"><i>मिश्र</i><par n="मिश्र__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="काठमाडौ"><i>काठमाडौ</i><par n="काठमाडौ__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="थापा"><i>थापा</i><par n="थापा__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="तामाङ"><i>तामाङ</i><par n="तामाङ__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="काठमाण्डौं"><i>काठमाण्डौं</i><par n="काठमाण्डौं__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="सुनसरी"><i>सुनसरी</i><par n="सुनसरी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="जापान"><i>जापान</i><par n="जापान__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="शाही"><i>शाही</i><par n="शाही__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कुमारी"><i>कुमारी</i><par n="कुमारी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="विनय"><i>विनय</i><par n="विनय__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जगन्नाथ"><i>जगन्नाथ</i><par n="जगन्नाथ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="फिलिपिन्स"><i>फिलिपिन्स</i><par n="फिलिपिन्स__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="तिलक"><i>तिलक</i><par n="तिलक__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कमला"><i>कमला</i><par n="कमला__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रामकृष्ण"><i>रामकृष्ण</i><par n="रामकृष्ण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कर्णाली"><i>कर्णाली</i><par n="कर्णाली__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="चीन"><i>चीन</i><par n="चीन__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="राजविराज"><i>राजविराज</i><par n="राजविराज__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="पाटन"><i>पाटन</i><par n="पाटन__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="काँग्रेस"><i>काँग्रेस</i><par n="काँग्रेस__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सुनकेशरी"><i>सुनकेशरी</i><par n="सुनकेशरी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="त्रिभुवन"><i>त्रिभुवन</i><par n="त्रिभुवन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जर्मनी"><i>जर्मनी</i><par n="जर्मनी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="काङ्ग्रेस"><i>काङ्ग्रेस</i><par n="काङ्ग्रेस__np"/></e>
    <e lm="शाक्य"><i>शाक्य</i><par n="शाक्य__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="धर्म"><i>धर्म</i><par n="धर्म__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="धनुषा"><i>धनुषा</i><par n="धनुषा__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="दक्ष"><i>दक्ष</i><par n="दक्ष__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="निर्मल"><i>निर्मल</i><par n="निर्मल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मकवानपुर"><i>मकवानपुर</i><par n="मकवानपुर__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="बेलायत"><i>बेलायत</i><par n="बेलायत__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="कुवेत"><i>कुवेत</i><par n="कुवेत__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="गोपाल"><i>गोपाल</i><par n="गोपाल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बंगलादेश"><i>बंगलादेश</i><par n="बंगलादेश__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="बस्नेत"><i>बस्नेत</i><par n="बस्नेत__np_mf_aa"/></e>
